Hawaii statutes.
§127A-16 Major disaster fund. (a) The
director shall submit requests to the legislature to appropriate from the
general revenues of the State sufficient moneys as may be necessary for
expenditure by or under the direction of the governor for immediate relief in
response to an emergency or disaster in any part of the State; provided that:

(1) The governor has issued a proclamation of a state
of emergency;

(2) The governor may not expend in excess of
$5,000,000 for immediate relief as a result of any single emergency or
disaster; and

(3) In addition to the funds in paragraph (2), an
additional $5,000,000 may be made available solely for the purpose of matching
federal disaster relief funds when these funds become available to the State
following a presidential disaster declaration.

In expending the moneys, the governor may allot any
portion thereof to any agency, office, or employee of the State or a county for
the most efficient relief for the population. Notwithstanding this subsection,
the only exception to paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) is that the director may use
up to $100,000 per year to support emergency reserve corps training.

(b) No later than one month after any
allotment by the governor or the expenditure of any fund moneys, the director
shall report to the legislature on the purpose of the allotment or expenditure.

(c) Federal reimbursement moneys for disaster
relief shall be deemed to be trust moneys and may be deposited into a trust
account with and under the control of the department of defense. These moneys
and any interest earned thereon shall be used for the purpose identified in
subsection (a) and shall not lapse to the general fund. [L 2014, c 111, pt of
§2; am L 2015, c 129, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next